Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-258
Authority; pledge; effect; lien; recording; not required.

Any pledge made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenue, money, or properties so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 58.